Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1349
Short title.

Sections 25-1349 to 25-1359 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 13.